Missouri, session 2026, SB1141.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 191, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 191.1705, to read as
follows:
191.1705. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Health care institution", any public or private
hospital, outpatient center for primary care, medical
center, physician organization, health care professional
association, outpatient center for surgical services,
private physician's office, pharmacy, long-term care
facility, medical school, nursing school, medical training
facility, or other entity or location in which health care
services are performed;
(2) "Health care professional", any physician; nurse
practitioner or other nurse; physician assistant; nurse's
aide; allied health professional; medical assistant;
employee of a hospital, outpatient center for primary care,
outpatient center for surgical services, long-term care
facility, or pharmacy; pharmacist; pharmacy technician;
medical school faculty member or student; nursing school

SB 1141 2
faculty member or student; psychology or counseling faculty
member or student; medical researcher; laboratory
technician; counselor; social worker; or other person who
facilitates or participates in a health care service;
(3) "Sex reassignment or gender identity
transitioning", the process in which a person transitions
from identifying with and living as a gender that
corresponds to his or her biological sex to identifying with
and living as a gender different from his or her biological
sex and may involve social, legal, or physical changes.
2. No health care institution or any health care
professional or other person shall be required to perform,
assist, or participate in medical procedures, treatments,
counseling, prescriptions, or surgeries related to sex
reassignment or gender identity transitioning if such
procedures, treatments, counseling, prescriptions, or
surgeries are contrary to the established policy of, or the
moral, ethical, or religious beliefs of, such health care
institution, health care professional, or other person.
3. No person or institution shall be:
(1) Denied or discriminated against in the receipt of
any public benefit, assistance, or privilege whatsoever; or
(2) Denied or discriminated against in any public or
private employment by any means including, but not limited
to, any adverse action related to hiring, promotion,
advancement, transfer, licensing, education, training, or
granting of hospital privileges or staff appointments on the
grounds that the person or institution refuses to perform,
assist, or participate in medical procedures, treatments,
counseling, prescriptions, or surgeries related to sex
reassignment or gender identity transitioning.

SB 1141 3
4. No cause of action shall accrue against any such
health care institution, health care professional, or other
person on account of such refusal to perform, assist, or
participate in medical procedures, treatments, counseling,
prescriptions, or surgeries related to sex reassignment or
gender identity transitioning. This section may be used as
a defense in any purported action related to or arising out
of the exercise of the rights protected by this section. A
health care institution, health care professional, or other
person protected by this section who is aggrieved by a
violation of the protections afforded under this section may
commence a civil action at law, or in equity, for damages
and injunctive or other appropriate relief. A prevailing
party who establishes a violation of the rights protected by
this section shall be awarded reasonable attorney's fees.
5. Nothing in this section shall be construed to allow
any person to deny visitation, recognition of a designated
representative for health care decision-making, or emergency
medical treatment necessary to cure an illness or injury as
required by law in accordance with the Emergency Medical
Treatment and Labor Act, 42 U.S.C. Section 1395dd, in effect
on January 1, 2026.
✓